Wyoming statutes. Title 24 Highways
Article 2. Identification of County Roads

§ 24-3-201.
Purpose of procedure.

The legislature finds that due to inaccurate and inconsistent records, there exist roads which are seldom used, not maintained and are not identified as or believed by the public to be county roads but are, in fact, county roads. Recognizing the numerous difficulties resulting from the existence of such county roads, the legislature finds it in the best interest of the public to create a procedure to identify county roads, thereby altering and vacating these abandoned or unnecessary county roads without survey.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 69, § 1.

Abandonment and vacation. —

In light of the statutory procedures for identifying a county road, along with the common law principles of “once a road, always a road” and the need for clear governmental action to vacate or abandon roads, a county did not vacate or abandon a road by not maintaining easily located records.
King v. Bd. of County Comm'rs of Fremont, 2010 WY 154, 244 P.3d 473,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 2010), reh'g denied,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. Jan. 4, 2011).

§ 24-3-202.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Board” means the board of county commissioners of any county;

“This act” means W.S.

24-3-201

through

24-3-206

.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 69, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 24-3-203.
Board may identify county roads through specified procedure; resolution; terms; limited to not more than 1 per area.

Notwithstanding W.S.

24-1-102

and

24-3-101

through

24-3-127

, when it finds the public interest so requires, the board may initiate the identification procedure under this act for county roads in the county by adopting a resolution to which maps shall be incorporated by reference which shall indicate a general description of all county roads in the area described in the map which shall be unaffected by identification under the resolution. No county road shall be listed as unaffected by a resolution under this act unless it was established under other law. No map incorporated into the resolution shall describe an area of less than six hundred forty (640) acres.

The board shall not adopt more than one (1) resolution identifying county roads under this act in any area of the county.

No road shall be vacated or altered under this act if it is currently identified and maintained as a county road. The identification procedure under this act shall not be used to establish a county road which was not previously established under other law.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 69, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout this section, see § 24-3-202(a)(ii).

Abandonment and vacation. —

In light of the statutory procedures for identifying a county road, along with the common law principles of “once a road, always a road” and the need for clear governmental action to vacate or abandon roads, a county did not vacate or abandon a road by not maintaining easily located records.
King v. Bd. of County Comm'rs of Fremont, 2010 WY 154, 244 P.3d 473,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 2010), reh'g denied,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. Jan. 4, 2011).

§ 24-3-204.
Notice of identification to be published.

Prior to adoption of a resolution identifying county roads in any area in the county, notice of the proposed identification shall be posted on the county’s official website in the manner provided in W.S. 18-3-516(f) and published for two (2) successive weeks in the designated official newspaper of the county in substantially the following form:

NOTICE OF IDENTIFICATION OF COUNTY ROADS UNDER THROUGH

24-3-206

W.S.

24-3-201

TO WHOM IT MAY CONCERN: The Board of County Commissioners intends to identify county roads in the following areas of (name of county) county under the identification procedure contained in W.S.

24-3-201

through

24-3-206

: (general description of areas described in the map, i.e. USGS Quad map, section, township, range, etc.) The only county roads in the township which shall exist after this identification procedure are described as follows: (Road name, road number or petition number) All other county roads within the area identified in the map which are not described above shall be accordingly vacated upon adoption of the resolution for identification. All objections to or claims for damage by reason of this identification procedure shall be filed in writing with the county clerk of this county before 12:00 noon on the day of (not less than thirty (30) days after publication of the second notice) or the county roads will be vacated as indicated without reference to the objections or claims.

Click to view

The notice shall include a map of each area affected indicating the approximate location of county roads which shall exist after the proposed identification action.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 69, § 1; 2014 ch. 93, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (a), substituted “shall be posted on county's official website in the manner provided in W.S. 18-3-516(f) and published for two (2) successive weeks in the designated official newspaper of the county” for “shall be published for four (4) seccessive weeks in four (4) successive issues in a newspaper of general circulation in the county” and substituted “the second notice” for “the fourth notice” in the second sentence in the paragraph of the form.

§ 24-3-205.
Objections and claims for damages; when filed; when barred; procedure for considering.

If the board initiates identification of county roads under this act, the board shall establish a date not less than thirty (30) days after the second notice is published, by which all objections to and claims for damages by reason of the identification shall be filed with the county clerk.

Objections to or claims for damages by reason of identification under this act filed after 12:00 noon [12:00 p.m.] on the date established in subsection (a) of this section shall not be considered by the board and are deemed waived.

If claims for damage are filed under this section, the claims shall be considered in the same manner as provided under W.S.

24-3-114

through

24-3-121

.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 69, § 1; 2021 ch. 149, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, substituted "second " for "fourth" in (a).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsections (a) and (b), see § 24-3-202(a)(ii).

§ 24-3-206.
Effect of identification.

If the board identifies roads under this act, the roads designated as county roads in the identification action shall be the only county roads within the area identified and all other county roads within the area identified are accordingly altered or vacated. The board shall direct the county clerk to and the county clerk shall record the identification as an entry in the abstract of lands books as if it were a conveyance of rights from the county to the lands affected. Roads identified as county roads under this act, shall not be county roads unless the county has a valid title or recorded easement to the right-of-way.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 69, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first and last sentences, see § 24-3-202(a)(ii).